Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202576-3219
Appraisal Management Company Fund; created; use; investment.

The board shall collect all fees and other revenue pursuant to the Nebraska Appraisal Management Company Registration Act and shall remit such fees and revenue to the State Treasurer for credit to the Appraisal Management Company Fund, which is hereby created. The fund shall be used to implement, administer, and enforce the act, except that transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Appraisal Management Company Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2011, LB410, § 19;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 159.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.